Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202669-2707
Nonresident or foreign nonparticipating manufacturer; agent for service of process.

(1) Any nonresident or foreign nonparticipating manufacturer that has not registered to do business in the state as a foreign corporation or business entity shall, as a condition precedent to having its brand families included or retained in the directory created in subsection (2) of section 69-2706, appoint and continually engage without interruption the services of an agent in Nebraska to act as agent for the service of process on whom all process, and any action or proceeding against it concerning or arising out of the enforcement of sections 69-2703 to 69-2711, may be served in any manner authorized by law. Such service shall constitute legal and valid service of process on the nonparticipating manufacturer. The nonparticipating manufacturer shall provide the name, address, telephone number, and proof of the appointment and availability of such agent to the Tax Commissioner and Attorney General.

(2) The nonparticipating manufacturer shall provide notice to the Tax Commissioner and Attorney General thirty calendar days prior to termination of the authority of an agent and shall further provide proof to the satisfaction of the Attorney General of the appointment of a new agent no less than five calendar days prior to the termination of an existing agent appointment. In the event an agent terminates an agency appointment, the nonparticipating manufacturer shall notify the Tax Commissioner and Attorney General of the termination within five calendar days and shall include proof to the satisfaction of the Attorney General of the appointment of a new agent.

(3) Any nonparticipating manufacturer whose products are sold in this state who has not appointed and engaged the services of an agent as required by this section shall be deemed to have appointed the Secretary of State as its agent for service of process. The appointment of the Secretary of State as agent shall not satisfy the condition precedent required in subsection (1) of this section to have the nonparticipating manufacturer's brand families included or retained in the directory.

Laws 2003, LB 572, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB580, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB590, § 8;

Laws 2019, LB397, § 15.